Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6056.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 70A.30.010 and 2020 c 143 s 1 and 2020 c 20 s 1366 are each reenacted and amended to read as follows:(1) Pursuant to the federal clean air act, the legislature adopts the California motor vehicle emission standards in Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations. ((The))Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the department of ecology shall adopt rules to implement the motor vehicle emission standards of the state of California, including the zero emission vehicle program, and shall amend the rules from time to time, to maintain consistency with the California motor vehicle emission standards and 42 U.S.C. Sec. 7507 (section 177 of the federal clean air act).(2) The provisions of this chapter do not apply with respect to the use by a resident of this state of a motor vehicle acquired and used while the resident is a member of the armed services and is stationed outside this state pursuant to military orders.(3)(a) The department of ecology must, by rule, exempt a utility service vehicle from the motor vehicle emission standards that are adopted by reference in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.(b) For the purposes of this subsection (3), "utility service vehicle" has the same meaning provided in 49 C.F.R. Sec. 395.2 (2025).--- END ---